Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-1-101. Words of inheritance unnecessary to create fee.

The term “heirs,” or other words of inheritance, are not requisite to create or convey an estate in fee.

Code 1858, § 2006 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 33); Shan., § 3672; Code 1932, § 7597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-101.

Cross-References. Forms of conveyances, §66-5-103.

Limitation of real actions, title 28, ch. 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, §§ 24, 27; 11 Tenn. Juris., Estates, § 4; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 132.

Law Reviews.

Bringing Tennessee into the Twentieth Century Re Possibilities of Reverter, Powers of Termination and Executory Interests When Used as Land Control Devices (Nicholas L. White), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 555 (1985).

Complexity in Property, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 79 (2013).

Property: A Bundle of Sticks or a Tree?, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 869 (2013).

Retelling Allotment: Indian Property Rights and the Myth of Common Ownership, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1559 (2001).

66-1-102. Estates tail abolished.

Any person seized or possessed of an estate in general or special tail, whether by purchase or descent, shall be held and deemed to be seized and possessed of the same in fee simple, fully and absolutely, without any condition or limitation whatsoever, to that person, that person's heirs and assigns, forever, and shall have full power and authority to sell or devise the same as such person thinks proper; and such estate shall descend under the same rules as other estates in fee simple.

Code 1858, § 2007 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 5); Shan., § 3673; Code 1932, § 7599; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 435.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, § 27; 11 Tenn. Juris., Estates, §§ 6, 8; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 134.

Law Reviews.

Future Interests — Tennessee Style, (Jack D. Jones), 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 413 (1987).

66-1-103. Rule in Shelley's case abolished.

Where a remainder is limited to the heirs or to the heirs of the body of a person, to whom a life estate in the same premises is given, the persons who, on the termination of the life estate, are heirs or heirs of body of such tenant, shall take as purchasers, by virtue of the remainder so limited to them.

Code 1858, § 2008 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 91, § 1); Shan., § 3674; Code 1932, § 7600; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 437, 438.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Estates, § 8; 21 Tenn. Juris., Remainders, Reversions and Executory Interests, §§ 7, 19, 23; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 135.

Law Reviews.

Destructibility of Contingent Remainders in Tennessee, I. Natural Termination (Jack D. Jones and William R. Heck), 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 761 (1975).

66-1-104. Construction of “dying without heirs.”

Every contingent limitation in any deed or will, made to depend upon the dying of any person without heir, or heirs of the body, or without issue of the body, or without children, or offspring, or descendants, or other relative, shall be a limitation to take effect when such person dies without heir, issue, child, offspring, or descendants, or other relative, as the case may be, living at the time of such person's death, or born to such person within ten (10) months thereafter; unless the intention of such limitation be otherwise expressly and plainly declared in the face of the deed or will creating it.

Code 1858, § 2009 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 91, § 3); Shan., § 3675; Code 1932, § 7601; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-104.

Cross-References. Tennessee uniform statutory rule against perpetuities, title 66, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 172, 173, 435.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Perpetuities, § 5; 21 Tenn. Juris., Remainders, Reversions and Executory Interests, § 7; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 149.

Law Reviews.

Wills — Construction of Gift Over on “Death Without Issue,” 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 479 (1940).

66-1-105. Contingent remainder supported by less than freehold.

It shall not be necessary, as at common law, that a contingent remainder be supported by a particular estate of the dignity of a freehold, but it shall be sufficient and lawful for contingent remainders to be supported by a preceding estate for years.

Acts 1877, ch. 102, § 1; Shan., § 3676; Code 1932, § 7602; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 171.

Law Reviews.

Destructibility of Contingent Remainders in Tennessee (Jack D. Jones and William R. Heck), 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 761 (1975).

66-1-106. Estate with unlimited power of disposition.

When the unlimited power of disposition, qualified or unqualified, not accompanied by any trust, is given expressly, in any written instrument, to the owner of any particular estate for life or years, legal or equitable, such estate is changed into a fee absolute as to right of disposition, and rights of creditors and purchasers, but subject to any future estate limited thereon or executory devise thereof, in event and so far as the power is not executed or the property sold for the satisfaction of debts during the continuance of the particular estate; provided, that any proceeds from the sale of such estate, not needed for the satisfaction of the debts of such owner during the continuance of the particular estate, shall be held in trust by such owner for the beneficiaries of the remainder interest and the purposes stated in such written instrument.

Code 1932, §§ 7603, 8093; Acts 1981, ch. 450, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 162, 432, 999.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Estates, § 8; 21 Tenn. Juris., Remainders, Reversions and Executory Interests, §§ 17, 28; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 132, 135, 138.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, IV. Transfers of Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 72 (1980).

66-1-107. Survivorship in joint tenancy abolished.

In all estates, real and personal, held in joint tenancy, the part or share of any tenant dying shall not descend or go to the surviving tenant or tenants, but shall descend or be vested in the heirs, executors, or administrators, respectively, of the tenant so dying, in the same manner as estates held by tenancy in common.

Code 1858, § 2010 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 6); Shan., § 3677; Code 1932, § 7604; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-107.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 439, 629.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Cotenancy, § 2; 14 Tenn. Juris., Husband and Wife, §§ 7, 11; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 137, 155.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — Tenancy by the Entirety — Joint Rights of Husband and Wife, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 815 (1975).

66-1-108. Survivorship in partnership property.

Nothing in §66-1-107 is intended to affect the right of a surviving partner to the joint property of the firm to settle the partnership business; such partner shall account with the heirs and personal representatives of the deceased partner for the surviving partner's share in the surplus.

Code 1858, § 2011 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 6); Shan., § 3678; mod. Code 1932, § 7605; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-108.

Cross-References. Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, death of partner, §61-2-705.

Revised Uniform Partnership Act, events causing partner's dissociation, §61-1-601.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 628.

66-1-109. Estate by entireties created by direct conveyance.

Any married person owning property or any interest therein in such person's own name, desiring to convert such person's interest in such property into an estate by the entireties with such person's spouse, may do so by direct conveyance to such spouse by an instrument of conveyance which shall provide that it is the grantor's intention by such instrument to create an estate by the entireties in and to the entire interest in the property previously held by the grantor.

Acts 1949, ch. 255, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8461.1 (Williams, § 7605.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-109.

Cross-References. Power of married woman to convey, §36-3-504.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 440.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-215, 8-216.

Law Reviews.

Tenancy by Entirety — Statute Validating Direct Conveyance by One Spouse to the Other, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 339 (1950).

66-1-110. Conveyance to spouse of interest in entirety.

Where property is held by husband and wife as tenants by the entirety, either spouse may by direct conveyance of such spouse's interest in the property vest the other spouse with title to the property in fee simple.

Acts 1955, ch. 78, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-110.

Cross-References. Tenancies by entirety, §36-3-505.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 440.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-218, 8-219.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1978).

66-1-111. Doctrine of worthier title abolished.

The doctrine of worthier title in both its inter vivos and testamentary branches, as it may apply to any kind of property, and regardless of whether it is applied as a rule of property or of construction, is abolished for all effects and purposes. This section shall not affect any right in property heretofore vested, and shall not affect the reversion of the grantor of any deed heretofore given. The doctrine of worthier title shall not operate to affect the disposition of property by the will of any person dying after July 1, 1983.

The consent of the beneficiaries of any express trust whenever created who are described in the trust only as the heirs of the settlor or the heirs of the settlor's body shall not be required for the termination of such trust during the life of the settlor.

Acts 1983, ch. 242, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-1-112. Alienability of certain future interests for purpose of merger of interests in grantee — Applicability.

A transfer of a possibility of reverter or right of entry by a holder other than the original grantor is invalid; provided, holders of a possibility of reverter or right of entry may freely transfer the interests to the holders of the corresponding fee simple determinable or fee simple subject to condition subsequent for the purpose of merger of the interests in any grantee.

This section applies to future interests regardless of whether the interests were created before, on, or after July 1, 2015; provided, this section does not apply to any future interest, the validity of which has been determined by a final judgment in a judicial proceeding or by a settlement among interested persons prior to July 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 14, § 1.

Compiler's Notes For the Preamble to the act concerning legislative intent, please refer to Acts 2015, ch. 14.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 14, § 2. March 19, 2015.